California statutes. Education Code
(2) (A) The state board may modify any proposed content standards or performance standards prior to adoption and may adopt content and performance standards in individual core curriculum areas as those standards are submitted to the state board. The state performance standards shall be established against specific grade level benchmarks of academic achievement for each subject area tested and shall be based on the knowledge and skills that pupils will need in order to succeed in the information-based, global economy of the 21st century. These skills shall not include personal behavioral standards or skills, including, but not limited to, honesty, sociability, ethics, or self-esteem. The standards adopted pursuant to this section shall be for the purpose of guiding state decisions regarding the development, adoption, and approval of assessment instruments pursuant to this chapter and does not mandate any actions or activities by school districts.

(B) Because these standards are models, the adoption of these standards is not subject to the Administrative Procedure Act. This subparagraph is declaratory of existing law.

(3) Before adopting academic content and performance standards, the state board shall hold regional hearings for the purpose of giving parents and other members of the public the opportunity to comment on the proposed standards.

(b) (1) The state board shall ensure that the statewide assessment system adopted pursuant to this chapter yields valid, reliable individual pupil scores and, where applicable, aggregate school scores, school district scores, and statewide scores of pupils and assesses basic academic skills and content standards, including the use of a direct writing assessment or other applied academic skills if deemed valid and reliable and if resources are made available for their use.

(2) This subdivision does not prevent the state board from developing or adopting an assessment instrument that also contains assessments of basic academic skills.

(c) To the extent feasible and as otherwise required, the state board shall ensure that assessments developed, or contracted for pursuant to Section 60642.5, by the state are aligned with the statewide content and performance standards adopted pursuant to subdivision (a). The department, with the approval of the state board, periodically shall contract for a review of the achievement test for conformance with these standards.

(d) After adopting statewide content and performance standards, the state board shall review the existing curriculum frameworks for conformity with the new statewide standards and shall modify the curriculum frameworks where appropriate to bring them into alignment with the standards.

(e) The state board shall adopt regulations for the conduct and administration of the testing and assessment program.

(f) The state board shall adopt a regulation for minimum security procedures that test and assessment publishers and school districts must follow to ensure the security and integrity of test and assessment questions and materials.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 757, Sec. 11.   Effective September 30, 2008.   Inoperative July 1, 2011, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.1.

(a) No later than June 1, 2001, the State Board of Education shall adopt content standards, pursuant to recommendations developed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, in the curriculum area of visual and performing arts.

(b) The content standards are intended to provide a framework for programs that a school may offer in the instruction of visual or performing arts. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school to follow the content standards.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as mandating an assessment of pupils in visual or performing arts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 432, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.2.

(a) No later than December 1, 2004, the State Board of Education shall adopt model content standards, pursuant to recommendations developed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, in the curriculum area of physical education.

(b) The model content standards are intended to provide a framework for programs that a school may offer in the instruction of physical education. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school to follow the model content standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 943, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.3.

(a) On or before June 1, 2009, the state board shall adopt content standards, pursuant to recommendations developed by the Superintendent, for teaching world languages in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) The content standards shall support the goals of Section 51212 and subdivision (c) of Section 51220 by including all of the following:

(1) A summary of the language goals which recognizes that instruction may begin in elementary or secondary school.

(2) A description of individual language skills that should be taught and attained at each level.

(3) Course content that is aligned with findings from research on second language acquisition and education.

(4) Course content that is aligned with the admission requirements for the California State University and the University of California.

(c) The content standards may be used by school districts to develop language programs and course assessments but are not mandatory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 28.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.4.

(a) On or before July 31, 2019, the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider developing and recommending to the state board computer science content standards for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, pursuant to recommendations developed by a group of computer science experts. The Instructional Quality Commission shall consider existing computer science content standards, which include, but are not limited to, the national K–12 computer science content standards developed by the Computer Science Teachers Association, and consider content standards that include, but are not necessarily limited to, standards for teaching coding. For purposes of this section, “coding” is the process of converting a program
 design into an accurate and detailed representation of that program in a suitable language.

(b) (1) The Superintendent, in consultation with the
 state board, shall consider convening the group of experts referenced in subdivision (a), and shall ensure that the members of the group include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) Teachers who teach computer science, including mathematics and science teachers, in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(B) Schoolsite principals.

(C) School district or county office of education administrators.

(D) University professors.

(E) Representatives of private sector business or industry.

(2) The Superintendent, in consultation with the state board, shall ensure that one-half of the members of the group are teachers as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(c) The computer science content standards may be used by school districts to develop computer science programs and course assessments but are not mandatory.

(d) The operation of this section is subject to an appropriation being made for purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 876, Sec. 1.   (AB 1539)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.5.

(a) (1) In consultation with the Instructional Quality Commission, the Superintendent shall recommend to the state board revisions to the World Language Content Standards for California Public Schools adopted by the state board in 2009 pursuant to Section 60605.3.

(2) These recommended revisions shall be based on the work of the group of experts convened pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) On or before January 31, 2019, the Superintendent, in consultation with the Instructional Quality Commission, shall present his or her recommended revisions to the state board.

(b) In consultation with the Instructional Quality
 Commission and the state board, the Superintendent shall select a group of experts in this subject area to assist the Superintendent in developing recommended revisions pursuant to this section. A majority of this group of experts shall be current public school elementary or secondary classroom teachers who have a professional teaching credential that is valid under state law.

(c) (1) Before presenting his or her recommended revisions to the state board pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the Superintendent, in consultation with the Instructional Quality Commission, shall hold a minimum of two public hearings in order for the public to provide input on the recommended revisions.

(2) The public hearings required by this subdivision shall be held pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of
 Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) (1) On or before March 31, 2019, the state board shall adopt, reject, or modify the recommended revisions.

(2) If the state board modifies the recommended revisions, it shall do both of the following:

(A) It shall explain, in writing, to the Governor and the Legislature the reasons for those modifications.

(B) It shall, in a meeting conducted pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), provide written reasons for its modifications. The state board shall not adopt its modified revisions at the same meeting it provides its written reasons, but, instead,
 shall adopt these modified revisions at a subsequent meeting conducted on or before May 31, 2019.

(3) If the state board rejects the recommended revisions, the state board shall transmit to the Superintendent, the Governor, and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a detailed written explanation of its reasons for rejecting the recommended revisions.

(e) If the state board adopts revisions to the World Language Content Standards for California Public Schools pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), the state board shall consider adopting curriculum framework and evaluation criteria for instructional materials that are aligned to the revised World Language Content Standards for California Public Schools on or before September 30, 2020, based on any recommendations the Instructional Quality
 Commission may make.

(f) If the state board adopts revisions to the World Language Content Standards for California Public Schools pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), the state board may adopt instructional materials for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, that are aligned to the revised World Language Content Standards for California Public Schools on or before January 31, 2022, based on any recommendations the Instructional Quality Commission may make.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 44.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.6.

Subject to the availability of funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the Superintendent, upon approval of the state board, shall contract for the development and distribution of separate workbooks for each of grades 2 to 11, inclusive. Each pupil in grades 2 to 11, inclusive, who is required to take the achievement tests described in Section 60642.5 shall receive a copy of the workbook designed for the same grade level in which the pupil is enrolled. These workbooks shall contain material to assist pupils and their parents with standards-based learning, including the grade appropriate academic content standards adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60605 and sample questions that require knowledge of these standards to
 answer. The workbooks also shall describe how the sample questions test knowledge of the state board adopted academic content standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 15.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.7.

The Superintendent, the state board, and any other entity or individual designated by the Governor shall participate in the Common Core State Standards Initiative consortium sponsored by the National Governors Association and the Council of Chief State School Officers or any associated or related interstate collaboration to jointly develop common high-quality standards or assessments aligned with the common set of standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 14.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.8.

(a) There is hereby established the Academic Content Standards Commission. The commission shall consist of 21 members, appointed as follows:

(1) Eleven members appointed by the Governor.

(2) Five members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(3) Five members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(b) Members of the commission shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority.

(c) Not less than half of the members appointed by each
 of the appointing authorities pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be current public school elementary or secondary classroom teachers.

(d) The commission shall develop academic content standards in language arts and mathematics. The standards shall be internationally benchmarked and build toward college and career readiness by the time of high school graduation. Unless otherwise allowed by the Secretary of the United States Department of Education, at least 85 percent of these standards shall be the common core academic standards developed by the consortium or interstate collaboration set forth in Section 60605.7.

(e) Pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Act, Article 9 (commencing with Sec. 11120) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, all meetings and hearings of the commission shall be open and available to the public.

(f) On or before July 15, 2010, the commission shall present its recommended academic content standards to the state board.

(g) On or before August 2, 2010, the state board shall do either of the following:

(1) Adopt the academic content standards as proposed by the commission.

(2) Reject the academic content standards as proposed by the commission. If the state board rejects the standards it shall provide a specific written explanation to the Superintendent, the Governor, and the Legislature of the reasons why the proposed standards were rejected.

(h) The Superintendent and state board shall present to the Governor and to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a schedule and implementation plan for integrating the
 academic content standards adopted pursuant to this section into the state educational system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 15.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.9.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the limitation in paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 60200, which requires that other criteria be approved at least 30 months prior to the date that the materials are to be approved for adoption, shall not apply to instructional materials adopted by the state board that are aligned with the content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8 in each of the content areas for which standards are revised or adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 16.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.10.

The Superintendent may recommend and the state board may adopt the college and career readiness anchor standards developed by the Common Core State Standards Initiative consortium. The state board may also take action to resolve any technical issues in the English language arts standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 654, Sec. 1.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.11.

(a) The Superintendent may recommend to the state board, and the state board may approve, modifications to the common core academic content standards in mathematics adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60605.8. If the state board modifies the common core academic content standards in mathematics, it shall explain, in writing, to the Governor and the Legislature the reasons for modifying the standards. The Superintendent’s recommendations and the state board’s actions shall assist schools in the implementation of the standards.

(1) In consultation with the state board, the Superintendent shall consult a group of experts in mathematics for purposes of developing recommendations pursuant to
 this section. The Superintendent shall ensure that the group of experts includes, but is not limited to, individuals who are teachers of mathematics in elementary and secondary schools, schoolsite principals, administrators of school districts or county offices of education, and university professors. Not less than one-half of the members of the group shall be currently employed public school teachers.

(2) The Superintendent and the state board shall hold a minimum of two public hearings pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) in order for the public to provide input on the modifications recommended pursuant to this section.

(3) On or before March 30, 2013, the Superintendent shall recommend modifications to the mathematics standards to the state board, and the
 state board, by that date, shall adopt, reject, or modify those recommendations.

(b) The modifications to the common core academic content standards in mathematics that the Superintendent recommends to the state board and that the state board approves shall ensure all of the following:

(1) The rigor of the state common core academic content standards in mathematics is maintained so that all high school graduates are prepared for college and careers, as specified in the common core academic content standards.

(2) All of the common core academic standards developed by the consortium or interstate collaboration set forth in Section 60605.7 are adopted.

(3) One set of standards is adopted at each grade level.

(4) The content standards for algebra I are based upon the common core academic content standards for mathematics.

(5) Redundant mathematics standards are eliminated.

(6) The implementation of standards is improved.

(7) Any technical issues in the standards are resolved.

(8) The modifications amount to no more than 15 percent of the common core academic content standards adopted by the state board.

(c) (1) Any modifications to the common core academic content standards in mathematics made pursuant to this section shall be incorporated into the curriculum framework and the evaluation criteria for mathematics
 for the purpose of adopting instructional materials in mathematics pursuant to Section 60207.

(2) This subdivision shall become operative only if Assembly Bill 1246 of the 2011–12 Regular Session is chaptered and becomes effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 654, Sec. 2.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

60605.13.

(a) The Superintendent, in consultation with the Instructional Quality Commission, shall recommend to the state board revisions to the visual and performing arts content standards in the subjects of dance, theater, music, and visual arts adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 60605.1, and shall recommend visual and performing arts standards in the subject of media arts.

(b) In consultation with the Instructional Quality Commission and the state board, the Superintendent shall select a group of experts in visual and performing arts for purposes of assisting the Superintendent in developing recommendations pursuant to this section. A majority of this group of experts shall be current public school elementary or secondary classroom
 teachers who have a professional teaching credential that is valid under state law.

(c) The National Core Arts Standards in the subjects of dance, theater, music, visual arts, and media arts developed by the National Coalition for Core Arts Standards shall serve as the basis for deliberations regarding revisions to the visual and performing arts content standards and regarding recommended standards in media arts.

(d) (1) The Superintendent, in consultation with the Instructional Quality Commission, shall hold a minimum of two public hearings in order for the public to provide input on the standards recommended pursuant to this section and the state board shall adopt, reject, or modify those recommendations at a subsequent public meeting.

(2) The public hearings and meetings required by this
 subdivision shall be held pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(e) On or before November 30, 2018, the Superintendent shall present to the state board the revised visual and performing arts content standards and recommended standards in media arts based on the work of the group of experts convened pursuant to subdivision (b), conducted in consultation with the Instructional Quality Commission.

(f) (1) On or before January 31, 2019, the state board shall adopt, reject, or modify the standards recommended by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (a). If the state board modifies the standards recommended by the Superintendent, the state board shall explain, in writing, the reasons for modifying the recommended content standards to the
 Governor and the Legislature.

(2) If the state board modifies the visual and performing arts content standards recommended by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (e), the state board shall, in a meeting conducted pursuant to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), provide written reasons for its revisions. The state board shall not adopt revised visual and performing arts content standards at the same meeting it provides its written reasons, but, instead, shall adopt these revisions at a subsequent meeting conducted no later than March 31, 2019.

(3) If the state board rejects the visual and performing arts content standards recommended by the Superintendent pursuant to subdivision (e), the state board shall transmit to the Superintendent, the Governor, and the
 appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a specific written explanation of the reasons for the rejection of the standards presented by the Superintendent.

(g) If the visual and performing arts content standards are adopted pursuant to subdivision (f), the state board shall consider the adoption of a curriculum framework and evaluation criteria for instructional materials that are aligned to the visual and performing arts content standards no later than July 31, 2020, based on recommendations of the Instructional Quality Commission.

(h) If the visual and performing arts content standards are adopted pursuant to subdivision (f), the state board may adopt instructional materials for kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, that are aligned to the visual and performing arts content standards no later than November 30, 2021, based on recommendations of the
 Instructional Quality Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 102, Sec. 2.   (AB 37)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

60607.

(a) Each pupil shall have an individual record of accomplishment by the end of grade 12 that includes the results of the achievement test required and administered annually as part of the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress (CAASPP), or any predecessor assessments, established pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640), results of end-of-course examinations he or she has taken, and the vocational education certification examinations he or she chose to take.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies and schools use the results of the academic achievement tests administered annually as part of the CAASPP to provide support to pupils and parents or guardians in
 order to assist pupils in strengthening their development as learners, and thereby to improve their academic achievement and performance in subsequent assessments.

(c) (1) Except for research provided for in former Section 49079.6, as it read on December 31, 2013, a pupil’s results or a record of accomplishment shall be private, and may not be released to any person, other than the pupil’s parent or guardian and a teacher, counselor, or administrator directly involved with the pupil, without the express written consent of either the parent or guardian of the pupil if the pupil is a minor, or the pupil if the pupil has reached the age of majority or is emancipated.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a pupil or his or her parent or guardian may authorize the release of pupil results or a record of accomplishment to a postsecondary
 educational institution for the purpose of credit, placement, or admission.

(B) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the results of an individual pupil on the CAASPP may be released to a postsecondary educational institution for the purpose of credit, placement, or admission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 327, Sec. 19.   (AB 1599)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

60608.

The governing board of each district shall, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Board of Education, conduct a testing program pursuant to this chapter and may also administer other tests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 975, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60610.

At the request of the state board, and in accordance with rules and regulations that the state board may adopt, each county superintendent of schools shall cooperate with and assist school districts and charter schools under his or her jurisdiction in carrying out the testing programs of those school districts and charter schools and other duties imposed on school districts by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 489, Sec. 10.   (AB 484)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

60611.

A local educational agency, district superintendent of schools, or principal or teacher of any elementary or secondary school, including a charter school, shall not carry on any program for the sole purpose of test preparation of pupils for the statewide pupil assessment system or a particular test used in the statewide pupil assessment system. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of materials to familiarize pupils with item types or the computer-based testing environment used in the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 327, Sec. 20.   (AB 1599)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

60612.

Upon adoption or approval of assessments pursuant to this chapter, the Superintendent shall prepare, and make available to parents, teachers, pupils, administrators, school board members, and the public, easily understood materials, in accordance with subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 60604, describing the nature and purposes of the assessments, the systems of scoring, and the valid uses to which the assessments will be put. The Superintendent shall produce the materials for parents in languages other than English in accordance with Section 48985. It is the intent of the Legislature that the department utilize the clearinghouse for multilingual documents to meet this requirement. The Superintendent shall consider
 information already provided by assessment consortia of which California is a member or assessment contractors when fulfilling this requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 489, Sec. 12.   (AB 484)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

60613.

A school district is an agent of the State Department of Education for the purpose of administering a test or assessment required pursuant to this article. No action may be brought or maintained against any school district or its officers or employees acting in accordance with the instructions of the Superintendent of Public Instruction or the State Board of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 828, Sec. 7.   Effective October 10, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

60614.

Notwithstanding Section 51513, no test, examination, or assessment given as part of the statewide pupil assessment program shall contain any questions or items that solicit or invite disclosure of a pupil’s, or his or her parents’ or guardians’, personal beliefs or practices in sex, family life, morality, or religion nor shall it contain any question designed to evaluate personal behavioral characteristics, including, but not limited to, honesty, integrity, sociability, or self esteem.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 975, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60615.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a parent’s or guardian’s written request to school officials to excuse his or her child from any or all parts of the assessments administered pursuant to this chapter shall be granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 975, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60616.

Any achievement test adopted by the state board pursuant to this chapter may be reviewed by any Member of the Legislature or any member of the governing board of a school district, if the member agrees in writing prior to the review to maintain the confidentiality of the test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 757, Sec. 14.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

60617.

The governing board of any school district may meet in closed session only to review the actual contents of any approved or adopted assessment, provided the governing board agrees by resolution to accept any terms or conditions for that review that are established by rules and regulations of the State Board of Education. The purpose of this provision is to maintain the confidentiality of the assessments under review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 975, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60618.

(a) The academic content and performance standards adopted by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 60605 that are used as standards for the purposes of this article are to be considered model standards for any other purpose.

(b) School districts may use these model standards as a guideline in developing district standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Program Evaluation and Analysis [60630. - 60630.]

60630.

(a) The Superintendent shall prepare and submit, and subsequently post on the internet website of the department, an annual report to the state board containing an analysis of the results and test scores of the summative assessments administered pursuant to Section 60640. The Superintendent shall notify the state board and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature that the annual report is available on the internet website of the department.

(b) The Superintendent shall post a periodic update on the implementation of the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress on the internet website of the department, and notify the state board and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature that the update is available on
 the internet website of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 89.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress [60640. - 60648.5.]

60640.

(a) There is hereby established the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, to be known as the CAASPP.

(b) Commencing with the 2013–14 school year, the CAASPP shall be composed of all of the following:

(1) (A) A consortium summative assessment in English language arts and mathematics for grades 3 to 8, inclusive, and grade 11 that measures content standards adopted by the state board.

(B) In the 2013–14 school year, the consortium summative assessment in English language arts and mathematics shall be a field test only, to enable the consortium to gauge the validity and reliability of these
 assessments and to conduct all necessary psychometric procedures and studies, including, but not necessarily limited to, achievement standard setting, and to allow the department to conduct studies regarding full implementation of the assessment system. These field tests and results shall not be used for any other purpose, including the calculation of any accountability measure.

(2) (A) Science grade level assessments in grades 5, 8, and 10 that measure content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605, until a successor assessment is implemented pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(B) For science assessments, the Superintendent shall make a recommendation to the state board as soon as is feasible after the adoption of science content standards pursuant to former Section 60605.85, as that section read on June 30, 2014, regarding the assessment of the newly
 adopted standards. Before making recommendations, the Superintendent shall consult with stakeholders, including, but not necessarily limited to, California science teachers, individuals with expertise in assessing English learners and pupils with disabilities, parents, and measurement experts, regarding the grade level and type of assessment. The recommendations shall include cost estimates and a plan for implementation of at least one assessment in each of the following grade spans:

(i) Grades 3 to 5, inclusive.

(ii) Grades 6 to 9, inclusive.

(iii) Grades 10 to 12, inclusive.

(3) The California Alternate Performance Assessment in grades 2 to 11, inclusive, in English language arts and mathematics and science in grades 5, 8, and 10, which measures
 content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605 until a successor assessment is implemented. The successor assessment shall be limited to the grades and subject areas assessed pursuant to paragraph (1) and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(4) The Early Assessment Program established by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 99300) of Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3.

(5) (A) A local educational agency may administer a primary language assessment aligned to the English language arts standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605, as it read on January 1, 2013, to pupils who are identified as limited English proficient and enrolled in any of grades 2 to 11, inclusive, until a subsequent primary language assessment aligned to the common core standards in English language arts adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8 is developed pursuant to subparagraph (E).

(B) If a local educational agency chooses to administer a primary language assessment to pupils identified as limited English proficient and enrolled in any of grades 2 to 11, inclusive, pursuant to subparagraph (A), it shall notify the department in a manner to be determined by the department and the costs shall be paid by the state and included as part of the testing contract, and the department shall provide the local educational agency a per pupil apportionment for administering the assessment pursuant to subdivision (l).

(C) The Superintendent shall consult with stakeholders, including assessment and English learner experts, to determine the content and purpose of a stand-alone language arts summative assessment in primary languages other than English that aligns with the English language arts content standards. The Superintendent shall consider the appropriate purpose for this
 assessment, including, but not necessarily limited to, support for the State Seal of Biliteracy and accountability. It is the intent of the Legislature that an assessment developed pursuant to this section be included in the state accountability system.

(D) The Superintendent shall report and make recommendations to the state board at a regularly scheduled public meeting no sooner than one year after the first full administration of the consortium computer-adaptive assessments in English language arts and mathematics summative assessments in grades 3 to 8, inclusive, and grade 11, regarding an implementation timeline and estimated costs of a stand-alone language arts summative assessment in primary languages other than English.

(E) The Superintendent shall develop, and the state board shall adopt, a primary language assessment. The Superintendent shall administer this assessment
 no later than the 2016–17 school year.

(F) This paragraph shall be operative only to the extent that funding is provided in the annual Budget Act or another statute for the purpose of this section.

(c) No later than March 1, 2016, the Superintendent shall submit to the state board recommendations on expanding the CAASPP to include additional assessments, for consideration at a regularly scheduled public meeting. The Superintendent shall also submit these recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and to the Director of Finance in accordance with all of the following:

(1) In consultation with stakeholders, including, but not necessarily limited to, California teachers, individuals with expertise in assessing English learners and pupils with disabilities, parents, and measurement
 experts, the Superintendent shall make recommendations regarding assessments, including the grade level, content, and type of assessment. These recommendations shall take into consideration the assessments already administered or planned pursuant to subdivision (b). The Superintendent shall consider the use of consortium-developed assessments, various item types, computer-based testing, and a timeline for implementation.

(2) The recommendations shall consider assessments in subjects, including, but not necessarily limited to, history-social science, technology, visual and performing arts, and other subjects as appropriate, as well as English language arts, mathematics, and science assessments to augment the assessments required under subdivision (b), and the use of various assessment options, including, but not necessarily limited to, computer-based tests, locally scored performance tasks, and portfolios.

(3) The recommendations shall include the use of an assessment calendar that would schedule the assessments identified pursuant to paragraph (2) over several years, the use of matrix sampling, if appropriate, and the use of population sampling.
